Utah statutes.
10-3-710.   Publication in book, pamphlet or looseleaf form -- State
statutes.
Ordinances revised, codified, compiled and published in book, pamphlet or
looseleaf form by authority of the governing body need not be printed or
published in any other manner, except that the ordinance adopting the
revision, codification or compilation shall be published or posted in the
manner provided by law. Provisions of state law may be adopted by reference.
Any changes necessary to conform those state laws with municipal ordinance
shall be noted.
